Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 4 State Symbols, Motto, Etc.
1-4-134. Arkansas's contribution to National Statuary Hall Collection — Legislative findings and intent.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

Pursuant to an act of the United States Congress, Arkansas is entitled to have placed in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol statues, in marble or bronze, not exceeding two (2) in number, of deceased persons who were citizens of Arkansas, and illustrious for their historic renown, or for distinguished civil or military service, whom Arkansas deems to be worthy of this national commemoration;

(2)

Arkansas has two (2) statues presently displayed in the National Statuary Hall Collection, one (1) dedicated to U.M. Rose by Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 6, Acts 1915, p. 1486, and one (1) dedicated to James P. Clarke by Acts 1917, No. 58;

(3)

Agreement by the General Assembly is required by federal law to replace the existing statues of U.M. Rose and James P. Clarke with statues of Daisy Lee Gatson Bates and John R. “Johnny” Cash;

(4)

Daisy Lee Gatson Bates, a citizen of Arkansas, served as a civil rights activist, writer, and publisher who worked and documented the struggle to end segregation in Arkansas;

(5)

Daisy Lee Gatson Bates is an inspiration through her lifelong career of social activism and her dedication to ending segregation in Arkansas;

(6)

John R. “Johnny” Cash, a citizen of Arkansas, is a legendary musician, who sold over ninety million (90,000,000) records, is one of the few people to be recognized in both the Country Music Hall of Fame and the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, and who received numerous awards for his work; and

(7)

John R. “Johnny” Cash articulated the story of his life in Arkansas through his music and made historic contributions to the musical history of our state and country.

(b)

The General Assembly finds and resolves that the statues of U.M. Rose and James P. Clarke located in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol should be removed and replaced with statues of Daisy Lee Gatson Bates and John R. “Johnny” Cash.

(c)

The Secretary of State shall:

(1)

Submit to the person responsible for the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol a written request to approve the replacement of both of the statues commemorating the distinguished service of Arkansas notable citizens and provided by the State of Arkansas currently on display in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol;

(2)

Coordinate with Arkansas's congressional delegation to provide all documentation necessary to comply with federal law regarding the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol; and

(3)

Enter into all agreements required by federal law to replace both of the statues in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol.

(d)

The General Assembly designates the following citizens of Arkansas to be represented in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol:

(1)

Daisy Lee Gatson Bates; and

(2)

John R. “Johnny” Cash.

(e)

For the statues to be displayed in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol, the Secretary of State shall:

(1)

Receive funds for the design, completion, transport, and display of the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, or both, including without limitation:

(A)

Appropriations made specific to this section; and

(B)

Private gifts, grants, and donations from individuals and organizations to be deposited as trust funds into the National Statuary Hall Collection Trust Fund;

(2)

Provide communication and outreach methods to fund the completion, transport, and display of the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, or both;

(3)

Enter into all necessary contracts for the design, completion, transport, and display of the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, or both;

(4)

Prior to the approval of the design, material, production, and method of display of the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, or both, submit the proposed action for review by:

(A)

The Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee if the General Assembly is in session;

(B)

The Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission; and

(C)

Any other commission established to facilitate the purposes of this section;

(5)

Remove and relocate the existing statue representing U.M. Rose and the existing statue representing James P. Clarke in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol; and

(6)

Organize an event unveiling the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates and the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash.

(f)

The Secretary of State and the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission are not responsible for funding any costs specific to this section from sources not designated specifically to the placement and replacement of Arkansas statues in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 581, § 1; 2019, No. 1068, §
1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Act 2019, No. 1068, § 4, provided: “Rules.

“(a)

The Secretary of State may promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.

“(b)(1)

If adopting necessary initial rules to implement this act, a final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

“(A)

On or before March 1, 2020; or

“(B)

If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by March 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

“(2)

The Secretary of State shall file any necessary proposed rules with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309 sufficiently in advance of March 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before March 1, 2020.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added “Coordinate with Arkansas's congressional delegation to” in (c)(2); deleted (c)(4); rewrote (e); added (f); and made a stylistic change.

1-4-135. State dinosaur.

(a)

The Arkansaurus fridayi is designated as the official dinosaur of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish a publication or brochure to list or display the state dinosaur.

(2)

A state agency or office may include information concerning the state dinosaur in a future publication or brochure or in a scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 377, § 2.

1-4-136. State knife.

The Bowie knife is designated the official knife of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 510, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 510, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that the:

“(1)

Bowie knife has played an important part in Arkansas history;

“(2)

Bowie knife was known as early as 1835 as an ‘Arkansas Toothpick’;

“(3)

Bowie knife was used in Arkansas in 1836 when Arkansas was admitted to the union;

“(4)

Bowie knife is regarded as Arkansas’s most famous weapon; and

“(5)

Bowie knife continues to be produced by artisans for use by outdoorsmen and hunters in the state.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize the significance of the Bowie knife in the history of Arkansas.”

1-4-137. State primitive fish.

(a)

The alligator gar is designated the official primitive fish of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish a publication or brochure in order to list or display the alligator gar.

(2)

A state agency or office may include the information concerning the state primitive fish in future publications or brochures or in a scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

(c)

This section does not grant a protected status to the alligator gar.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 576, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 576, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

Arkansas is one (1) of only five (5) states that does not designate an official state fish;

“(2)

The designation of an official state primitive fish provides conservation and educational benefits, increases interest in Arkansas's rich and diverse fauna, and promotes the important study of fisheries and ichthyology;

“(3)

The alligator gar, Atractosteus spatula, is commonly recognized by most citizens of the State of Arkansas for its razor-sharp teeth and its stone-hard scales, which make it as tough as the Arkansas Razorback;

“(4)

Alligator gar in Arkansas have been known to exceed eight feet (8') in length and two hundred forty pounds (240 lbs.) in weight, by far the largest fish in Arkansas;

“(5)

The alligator gar has for centuries been one (1) of Arkansas's most remarkable resident creatures, with its scales used by Native Americans for arrowheads and its striking features likely noted by Spanish explorer Hernando De Soto, who described eating a fish ‘the size of a hog, with rows of teeth above and below’ in his exploration in the 1500s of what later became the State of Arkansas; and

“(6)

While acknowledging the known diversity of fishes represented in Arkansas's lakes and rivers, the General Assembly concludes that the alligator gar shall represent the State of Arkansas as the official primitive fish of the State of Arkansas.”

1-4-138. State firearm.

The shotgun is designated the official firearm of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 685, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 685, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The right to hunt, fish, trap, and harvest wildlife is a right guaranteed by the Arkansas Constitution;

“(2)

Hunting provides a recreational and economic benefit to the citizens of the state;

“(3)

The shotgun is the primary weapon used for hunting waterfowl in the state; and

“(4)

The shotgun was in use for hunting in the state before 1836 when Arkansas was admitted to the Union.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize the important role the shotgun plays in hunting in Arkansas.”

1-4-139. Birthplace of the Bowie Knife, Arkansas Heritage Site — Legislative findings and intent.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

The Bowie knife has been designated the official knife of the State of Arkansas;

(2)

The Bowie knife is recognized as Arkansas's most famous blade weapon and the national American blade;

(3)

Arkansas blacksmith James Black crafted an original Bowie knife in Washington, Hempstead County, Arkansas, in 1831;

(4)

Washington, Arkansas, and James Black became almost immediately famous as the birthplace and creator of the Bowie knife, respectively;

(5)

James Black continued to refine and improve his Bowie knife design into the world's toughest but most flexible knife from his shop in Washington, Arkansas; and

(6)

Because of the Bowie knife's national reputation, Washington, Arkansas, later became the location of the world's first recognized school of bladesmithing.

(b)(1)

Washington, Hempstead County, Arkansas, is designated the “Birthplace of the Bowie Knife, Arkansas Heritage Site”.

(2)

The designation of Washington, Hempstead County, Arkansas, as the “Birthplace of the Bowie Knife, Arkansas Heritage Site” is essential to:

(A)

Celebrate, protect, and preserve the history and status of the Arkansas-created Bowie knife throughout Arkansas, the United States, and the world; and

(B)

Preserve bladesmithing history and heritage, promote heritage arts and bladesmithing tourism in the area, and provide a historically accurate site designation for a heritage arts and bladesmithing enthusiast.

(c)

The University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana is designated to develop and operate a school of bladesmithing located in Washington, Arkansas, to promote and protect the art of bladesmithing and the Bowie knife crafted there.

(d)(1)

The Arkansas Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and the University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana, shall design a sign that displays the words and any logo for the “Birthplace of the Bowie Knife, Arkansas Heritage Site”.

(2)

The sign shall be placed on or about the location of the school of bladesmithing developed and operated in Washington, Arkansas, by the University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana.

(3)

Information regarding the proper placement of copies of the sign at additional locations to promote and direct tourism to Washington, Arkansas, shall be made available by the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

(4)

The sign in appropriate scale shall be used as the symbol on the state highway map and in all tourism mediums published by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to indicate the “Birthplace of the Bowie Knife, Arkansas Heritage Site”.

(e)(1)

The Division of Arkansas Heritage shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this section.

(2)(A)

When adopting the initial rules to implement this section, the final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

(i)

On or before January 1, 2020; or

(ii)

If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

(B)

The division shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before January 1, 2020.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 818, § 1.